Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,121
Certain professions and businesses; disciplinary actions; confidentiality; immunity.

A complaint submitted to the department regarding a credential holder subject to section 38-1,119 and the identity of any person making the complaint or providing information leading to the making of the complaint shall be confidential. Such persons shall be immune from criminal or civil liability of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for filing a complaint or for disclosure of documents, records, or other information to the department.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 121;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 5.